Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.140

Power to fill positions—Consent of county commissioners—Salaries and compensation.

All offices, places, positions, and employments coming within the purview of this chapter, shall be filled by the appointing power with the consent of the board of county commissioners, and nothing herein contained shall infringe upon such authority that an appointing power may have to fix the salaries and compensation of all employees employed hereunder.

[ 1959 c 1 s 14 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]